Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1360
Drainage facilities on highways; use; consent of department.

No person may use the drainage facilities of a highway for private purposes without first obtaining the written consent of the department.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 60, p. 442.